Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2315.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-132, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-132. Certification of exchange teachers and professors The state board of education shall issue temporary certificates to exchange teachers and professors of foreign countries and other states whose training and background comply with the rules promulgated adopted by the board for certification and are equivalent to those of the local teacher or PROFESSOR with whom the exchange is made. END_STATUTE